North Carolina, session 2025, HB119.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 115C-84.2(d) reads as rewritten:
"(d) Opening and Closing Dates. – Local boards of education shall determine the dates of
opening and closing the public schools under subdivision (a)(1) of this section. Except for
year-round schools, the opening date for students shall be no earlier than the Monday closest to
August 26, and the 10, unless August 10 falls on a weekend, in which case the opening date shall
be either the Friday immediately preceding or the Monday immediately following August 10.
The closing date for students shall be no later than the Friday closest to June 11. On a showing
of good cause, the State Board of Education may waive the requirement that the opening date for
students be no earlier than the Monday closest to August 26 and may allow the local board of
education to set an opening date no earlier than the Monday closest to August 19, to the extent
that school calendars are able to provide sufficient days to accommodate anticipated makeup
days due to school closings. A local board may revise the scheduled closing date if necessary in
order to comply with the minimum requirements for instructional days or instructional time. For
purposes of this subsection, the term "good cause" means that schools in any local school
administrative unit in a county have been closed eight days per year during any four of the last
10 years because of severe weather conditions, energy shortages, power failures, or other
emergency situations.
The required opening and closing dates under this subsection shall not apply to any school
that a local board designated as having a modified calendar for the 2003-2004 school year or to
any school that was part of a planned program in the 2003-2004 school year for a system of
modified calendar schools, so long as the school operates under a modified calendar."
SECTION 2. This act applies only to Pitt County.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning with
the 2025-2026 school year.
*H119-v-1*